West Virginia, session 2026, SB913.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 18a. directed research endowments. §1. Repeal of section relating to annual report for the West Virginia Research Trust Fund. That §18B-18A-12 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home